Hawaii, session 2026, SB3204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that more programs and resources are necessary to increase family resilience and reduce the risk of child abuse or neglect.  Many families at high risk of entering the child welfare system are unaware of available services or how to access them, or public benefits are not available to address the economic or other fiscal challenge they are facing. The malama ohana working group was established by Act 86, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, within the office of wellness and resilience to seek, design, and recommend transformative changes to the State's existing child welfare system.  In its report submitted to the 2025 legislature, the malama ohana working group stated there is a shortage of resources in Hawaii dedicated to preventing children and families' involvement with child welfare services, especially primary prevention and universal support.  The malama ohana working group recommended the establishment of primary prevention and universal support programs that are trauma-informed and culturally responsive in an effort to divert children and families away from involvement with the child welfare system. The legislature also finds that community- and school-based organizations are safe, accessible, and non-judgmental spaces where families can access formal and informal supports and referrals. Providing family strengthening programming helps to increase parents' protective factors, including:  parental resilience, social connections, concrete support, knowledge of parenting and child development, and social-emotional competence of children.  Community- and school-based organizations, such as family resource centers, have been successful in reducing the number of families reported to the child welfare system. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a two‑year family resilience pilot program within the office of wellness and resilience. SECTION 2.  (a) There is established within the office of wellness and resilience a family resilience pilot program to build family resilience and provide comprehensive specialized support services to eligible families.  The program shall: (1)  Hire and train five trauma-informed peer support resource navigators to assist up to eighty families with enrollment in public or other benefits, parenting classes, and cultural family strengthening program services; provided that each peer support resource navigator shall be trained in alignment with the recommendations of the peer support specialists working group established by Act 88, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024; provided further that each peer support resource navigator shall use motivational interviewing methods and serve not more than twenty families; (2)  Train program staff on eligibility screening to ensure families meet temporary assistance for needy families (TANF) or related eligibility criteria and connect interested and eligible families with peer support resource navigators; (3)  Assist families to identify goals, connect them to community resources and supports, and assist them with applications for public assistance benefits, housing, education, or employment that are in alignment with their identified goals; and (4)  Identify monthly parenting classes or cultural family strengthening services offered by contracted or subcontracted providers and connect families to those classes and services as appropriate. (b)  The office of wellness and resilience may contract with a third-party administrator to operate the family resilience pilot program. (c)  The office of wellness and resilience shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, on the family resilience pilot program to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2028.  The report shall include the number of eligible families who: (1)  Connected to and are receiving community resources and supports; (2)  Applied for public assistance benefits, housing, education, or employment; (3)  Participated in parenting classes and cultural family strengthening services; and (4)  Reported favorable changes in their knowledge, attitudes or beliefs, skill acquisition, behavior, and relationships as a direct result of program participation. SECTION 3. There is appropriated or authorized from the temporary assistance for needy families (TANF) funds the sum of $600,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the family resilience pilot program established pursuant to section 2 of this Act, including the contracting of services to implement and operate the program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of human services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. If any part of this Act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition for the allocation of federal funds to the State, the conflicting part of this Act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this Act in its application to the agencies concerned. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026, and shall be repealed on June 30, 2028.